Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.175

Unlawful sales practices.

It is unlawful to fit or dispense a hearing instrument to a resident of this state if the attempted sale or purchase is offered or made by telephone or mail order and there is no face-to-face contact to test or otherwise determine the needs of the prospective purchaser. This section does not apply to the sale of hearing instruments by wholesalers to licensees under this chapter.

[ 2002 c 310 s 18; 1996 c 200 s 23; 1983 c 39 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.